Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201919-3309
Alternative authority and procedure.

The Offstreet Parking District Act does not affect any other law relating to the same or any similar subject but provides an alternative authority and procedure for the subject to which it relates. When proceeding under the act, only the provisions of the act need be followed.

Laws 1967, c. 60, § 9, p. 200;

R.S.Supp.,1967, § 16-820;

Laws 1969, c. 88, § 9, p. 440;

Laws 2019, LB193, § 187.
September 1, 2019